Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 62 The Rhode Island Student Loan Authority

16-62-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as “The Rhode Island Student Loan Authority Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1.

16-62-2.
Findings.

The purpose of this chapter is to authorize a system of financial assistance, consisting of grants, loans, and other aids, for qualified inhabitants of the state to enable them to obtain a postsecondary education by attending public or private educational institutions both within and without the state. The general assembly has found and declares that it is in the public interest and essential to the welfare and well being of the inhabitants of the state and to the proper growth and development of the state to foster and provide financial assistance to inhabitants of the state, properly qualified for it, in order to help them to obtain a postsecondary education. The general assembly has found that many inhabitants of the state who are fully qualified to enroll in appropriate educational institutions for furthering their education beyond the high school level lack the financial means and are unable, without financial assistance as authorized under this chapter, to pay the cost of that education, with a consequent irreparable loss to the state of valuable talents vital to its welfare. The general assembly has determined that the establishment of a proper system of financial assistance for that objective purpose serves a public purpose and is fully consistent with the long established policy of the state to encourage, promote and assist the education of the people of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1.

16-62-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings unless the context shall indicate another or different meaning or intent:

“Authority” means the governmental agency and public instrumentality authorized, created, and established pursuant to §

16-62-4

.

“Bonds” and “notes” means the bonds, notes, securities, or other obligations or evidences of indebtedness issued by the authority pursuant to this chapter, all of which shall be issued under the name of or known as obligations of the Rhode Island student loan authority.

“Education loan” means a loan to a student or the parent, legal guardian, or sponsor of the student, or to an eligible institution, for the purpose of financing a student’s attendance at the eligible institution. The loan may provide that the student, parent, legal guardian, or sponsor of the student or eligible institution may be held jointly and severally liable for the education loan.

“Eligible institution” means, subject to further particular or more restrictive definition by regulation of the authority: (i) an institution of higher learning, (ii) a vocational school, or (iii) with respect to students who are nationals of the United States, an institution outside the United States which is comparable to an institution of higher education or to a vocational school and which has been approved by the authority and by the secretary for purposes of the guaranteed student loan program.

“Eligible loan” means a loan to a student or to the parent of a student insured or guaranteed by the secretary, Rhode Island division of higher education assistance, or by any other governmental or private agency, corporation, or organization having a reinsurance or guaranty agreement with the secretary applicable to that loan.

“Guaranteed student loan program” means the program of federal student loan insurance and reinsurance administered by the secretary.

“Lender” means, subject to further particular or more restrictive definition by regulation of the authority, any governmental or private agency, corporation, organization, or institution (including educational institutions and the authority itself) designated as an “eligible lender” by federal statute, regulation, or administrative ruling for the purposes of the guaranteed student loan program.

“Secretary” means the United States secretary of education or the secretary of health and human services.

“State” means the state of Rhode Island.

“Student” means an individual who under rules promulgated by the authority meets the enrollment and satisfactory progress requirement necessary for making an eligible student loan or an education loan, as applicable. This designation shall include dependent and independent undergraduate students, and graduate and professional students.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 8.

16-62-4.
Creation.

There is authorized, created, and established a public corporation of the state having a legal existence distinct from the state and not constituting a department of state government, which is a governmental agency and public instrumentality of the state, to be known as the “Rhode Island student loan authority,” with the powers that are set forth in this chapter, for the purposes of financing education through the making, purchasing, taking, acquiring, or lending against the security of, eligible loans and education loans and of selling eligible loans and education loans made, taken, endorsed, acquired, or purchased by it to governmental or private financial institutions.

The exercise by the authority of the powers conferred by this chapter shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential governmental function of the state for public purposes. It is the intent of the general assembly by the passage of this chapter to vest in the authority all powers, authority, rights, privileges, and titles which may be necessary to enable it to accomplish the purposes set forth in this chapter, and this chapter and the powers granted by it shall be liberally construed in conformity with those purposes.

The authority and its corporate existence shall continue until terminated by law or until the authority shall cease entirely and continuously to conduct or be involved in any business in furtherance of its purposes, provided that no termination shall take effect so long as the authority shall have bonds, notes, or other obligations outstanding, unless adequate provision shall have been made for their payment pursuant to the documents securing the bonds, notes, or other obligations or to the law. Upon termination of the existence of the authority, all its rights and properties shall pass to and be vested in the state. At no time shall the assets or other property of the authority inure to the benefit of any person or other corporation or entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 35, § 1.

16-62-5.
General powers.

The authority shall have all the powers necessary and convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including without limiting the generality of the preceding statement, the power:

To sue and be sued, complain, and defend, in its corporate name.

To have a seal which may be altered at pleasure, and to use it by causing it, or a facsimile of it, to be impressed or affixed or in any other manner reproduced.

To purchase, take, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use, and deal in and with, real or personal property, or any interest in it, wherever situated.

To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, transfer, and dispose of all or any part of its property and assets for any consideration and upon any terms and conditions as the authority shall determine.

To make contracts and incur liabilities, and borrow money at any rates of interest as the authority may determine.

To make and execute all contracts, agreements, and instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the authority granted by this chapter.

To lend money for its purposes, and invest and reinvest its funds.

To conduct its activities, carry on its operations, and have offices and exercise the powers granted by this chapter, within or without the state.

To elect, appoint, or employ in its discretion officers and agents of the authority, and define their duties and fix their compensation.

To make and alter bylaws, not inconsistent with this chapter, for the administration and regulation of the affairs of the authority, and those bylaws may contain provisions indemnifying any person who is or was a director, officer, employee, or agent of the authority, in the manner and to the extent provided in §

7-1.2-814

.

To have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect its purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 13; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 13.

16-62-6.
Additional general powers.

In addition to the powers enumerated in §

16-62-5

, the authority shall have the power:

To lend money to students and to parents of students and to refinance or consolidate eligible loans and education loans previously made to a student or parent by the authority or other lending sources for the purpose of assisting the student in obtaining an education in an eligible institution, including refinancing or consolidating obligations previously incurred by a student or a parent with other lending sources for this purpose and participating in loans to students or parents for this purpose with other lending sources.

To make, acquire, take, or purchase eligible loans and education loans with the proceeds of bonds or notes or any other funds of the authority available for it or any interest or participation in it, in any amount, at any price or prices, and upon any terms and conditions as the authority will determine.

To sell eligible loans held by the authority to governmental or private financial institutions, or to borrow from those financial institutions against the security of these eligible loans in any amounts, at any price or prices, and upon any terms and conditions as the authority shall determine.

To procure insurance of every nature or to enter into agreements with eligible institutions to protect the authority against losses that may be incurred in connection with its property, assets, activities, or the exercise of the powers granted under this chapter.

Subject to a contract with the holders of its bonds or notes, or a contract with the recipient of an eligible loan, when the authority deems it necessary or desirable to consent to the modification, with respect to security, rate of interest, time of payment of interest or principal, or any other term of a bond or note, contract, or agreement between the authority and the recipient or maker of a loan, bond, or note holder, or agency or institution guaranteeing the repayment, purchasing, or selling of an eligible loan.

To engage the services of consultants on a contract basis for rendering professional and technical assistance and advice, and to employ attorneys, accountants, financial experts, and any other advisors, consultants, and agents that may be necessary in its judgment, and to fix their compensation.

To contract for and to accept any gifts, grants, loans, funds, property (real or personal), or financial or other assistance in any form from the United States, or any agency or instrumentality of it, or from the state or any agency or instrumentality of it, or from any other source, and to comply, subject to the provisions of this chapter, with the terms and conditions of it.

To borrow money and to issue bonds and notes and to provide for the rights of the holders of these, and to secure the bonds and notes by assignment, pledge, or granting of a security interest in its property, including, without limitation, all or a part of its interest in eligible loans, education loans, or agreements with eligible institutions with regard to these for the purpose of providing funds to effectuate its purposes under this chapter, including the financing of eligible loans or education loans or for the purpose of refunding any bonds previously issued.

To prescribe rules and regulations deemed necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including, without limitation, rules and regulations: (i) To ensure compliance by the authority with the requirements imposed by statutes or regulations governing the guaranty, insurance, purchase, or other dealing in eligible loans by federal agencies, instrumentalities, or corporations, and (ii) To set standards of eligibility for educational institutions, students, and lenders and to define residency and all other terms as the authority deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

To establish penalties for violations of any order, rule, or regulation of the authority, and a method for enforcing the orders, rules, and regulations.

To set and collect fees and charges in connection with its eligible loans, commitments, and servicing, including, without limitation, reimbursement of the costs of financing by the authority, service charges, insurance premiums, and costs incurred by the authority in carrying out its corporate purposes.

To create and establish any other fund, or funds, that may be necessary or desirable for its corporate purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 162, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 603, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 374, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 375, § 1.

16-62-7.
Directors, officers, and employees.

The powers of the authority shall be vested in a board of directors consisting of six (6) members as follows: five (5) members appointed by the governor from among members of the general public, who are qualified by training or experience in education, finance, or personal investment consulting and made in accordance with subsection (b) of this section as provided in §

16-57-7

, all appointments are subject to the advice and consent of the senate; and the general treasurer, ex-officio. The general treasurer may designate a subordinate within his or her department or agency to represent him or her at all meetings of the board.

All members appointed by the governor shall be appointed to terms of five (5) years, and the governor shall, during the month of January preceding the expiration of each term, appoint a member whose term will then next expire. In the event of a vacancy occurring in the office of a member by death, resignation, removal, or otherwise, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as an original appointment but only for the remainder of the term of the former member.

The directors shall receive no compensation for the performance of their duties under this chapter, but each director shall be reimbursed for his or her reasonable expenses incurred in carrying out those duties. A director may engage in private employment, or in a profession or business.

The board of directors shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson. Four (4) directors shall constitute a quorum and any action to be taken by the authority under the provisions of this chapter may be authorized by resolution approved by a majority of the directors present and voting at any regular or special meeting at which a quorum is present. A vacancy in the membership of the board of directors shall not impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the authority.

In addition to electing a chairperson, the board of directors shall appoint a secretary and any additional officers and staff members as they shall deem appropriate and shall determine the amount of compensation, if any, each shall receive. The board of directors may appoint a chief executive officer and vest in that person or his or her subordinates the authority to appoint additional staff members and to determine the amount of compensation each individual shall receive.

No fulltime employee shall during the period of his or her employment by the authority engage in any other private employment, profession, or business, including, but not limited to, consulting.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, it shall not be or constitute a conflict of interest for a director, officer, or employee of any financial institution, investment banking firm, brokerage firm, commercial bank, trust company, savings and loan association, credit union, insurance company, educational institution, or any other firm, person, or corporation to serve as a director of the authority nor shall any contract or transaction between the authority and any financial institution, investment banking firm, brokerage firm, commercial bank, trust company, savings and loan association, credit union, insurance company, educational institution, or any other firm, person, or corporation be void or voidable by reason of any service as director of the authority. If any director, officer, or employee of the authority shall be interested either directly or indirectly, or shall be a director, officer, or employee of or have an ownership interest (other than as the owner of less than one percent (1%) of the shares of a publicly held corporation) in any firm or corporation interested directly or indirectly in any contract with the authority, that interest shall be disclosed to the authority and set forth in the minutes of the authority, and the director, officer, or employee having that interest in it shall not participate on behalf of the authority in the authorization of this contract. Interested directors may be counted in determining the presence of a quorum at a meeting of the board of directors of the authority which authorizes the contract or transaction.

Any action taken by the authority under the provisions of this chapter may be authorized by vote at any regular or special meeting, and each vote shall take effect immediately.

The board of directors may designate from among its members an executive committee and one or more other committees each of which, to the extent authorized by the board of directors, shall have and may exercise all the authority of the board of directors, but no committee shall have the authority of the board of directors in reference to the disposition of all or substantially all the property and assets of the authority, or amending the bylaws of the authority.

Any action required by this chapter to be taken at a meeting of the board of directors, or any action which may be taken at a meeting of the board of directors, or committee of it, may be taken without a meeting if a consent in writing, setting forth the action to be taken, shall be signed before or after that action by all of the directors, or all of the members of the committee.

The board shall conduct a training course for newly appointed and qualified members and new designees of ex-officio members within six (6) months of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the chair of the board, approved by the board, and conducted by the chair of the board. The board may approve the use of any board or staff members or other individuals to assist with training. The training course shall include instruction in the subject area of this chapter and chapters 46 of title 42, 14 of title 36, and 2 of title 38; and the board’s rules and regulations. The director of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act, disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of chapters 46 of title 42, 14 of title 36, and 2 of title 38.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 38, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 241, § 8; P.L. 2005, ch. 319, § 8; P.L. 2006, ch. 332, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 435, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 362, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 2.

16-62-8.
Loans to minors.

Any person qualifying for an eligible loan shall not be disqualified to receive the loan made for or guaranteed by the authority by reason of his being a minor. For the purpose of applying for, securing, receiving, and repaying this loan, any person shall be deemed to have full legal capacity to act and shall have all the rights, powers, privileges, and obligations of a person of full age and respect to it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1.

16-62-9.
Bonds and notes of the authority.

The authority shall have the power and is authorized to issue its negotiable bonds and notes in one or more series in any principal amounts as in the opinion of the authority shall be necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving its purposes, including the payment of interest on bonds and notes of the authority; the establishment of reserves to secure these bonds and notes; and the making of all other expenditures of the authority incident to and necessary or convenient to carrying out its corporate purposes and powers.

All bonds and notes issued by the authority may be secured by the full faith and credit of the authority; or may be payable solely out of revenues and receipts derived from the pledge or assignment of, grant of security interest in, or sale of eligible loans or education loans owned by it, or any part of it; or out of receipts upon repayment of any eligible loans or education loans or any part of these made to students or to parents, legal guardians, or sponsors of students, or to institutions or lenders; or upon the undisbursed proceeds of the bonds or notes; or upon guaranty payments of principal and interest on eligible loans; or upon interest subsidy payments; or upon investment earnings of any of these revenues, receipts, proceeds or payments; or upon any other form of security available to the authority for this purpose, all as may be designated in the proceedings of the authority under which the bonds or notes shall be authorized to be issued. The bonds and notes may be executed and delivered by the authority at any time; may be in any form and denominations and of any tenor and maturities; and may be in bearer form or in registered form, as to principal and interest or as to principal alone, all as the authority may determine.

Bonds may be payable in any installments, and at any times not exceeding forty (40) years from their date, as shall be determined by the authority.

Notes, and any renewals of notes, may be payable in any installments and at any times not exceeding ten (10) years from the date of the original issue of the notes, as shall be determined by the authority.

Bonds and notes may be payable at any places, whether within or without the state; may bear interest at any rate or rates payable at any time or times and at any place or places and evidenced in any manner; and may contain any provisions not inconsistent with this section, all as shall be provided in the proceedings of the authority under which they shall be authorized to be issued.

There may be retained, by provisions made in the proceedings under which any bonds or notes of the authority are authorized to be issued, an option to redeem all or any part of these, at any prices and upon any notice, and on any further terms and conditions as shall be set forth on the record of those proceedings and on the face of the bonds or notes.

Any bonds or notes of the authority may be sold at any prices, at public or private sale, and in any manner as shall be determined by the authority, and the authority shall pay all expenses, premiums, and commissions as it shall deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance and sale of these.

Money of the authority, including without limitation: revenues, receipts, proceeds, payments, or earnings listed in subsection (b), may be invested and reinvested in any obligations, securities, and other investments consistent with the purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, bonds and notes of the authority as shall be specified in the resolutions under which the bonds or notes are authorized. In no case shall such investment in bonds or notes of the authority constitute an extinguishment of the obligations represented by such bonds and notes.

Issuance by the authority of one or more series of bonds or notes for one or more purposes shall not preclude it from issuing other bonds or notes for the same purpose, or purposes, but the proceedings where any subsequent bonds or notes may be issued shall recognize and protect a prior pledge or mortgage made for a prior issue of bonds or notes unless, in the proceedings authorizing the prior issue, the right is reserved to issue subsequent bonds or notes on a parity with that prior issue.

The authority is authorized to issue bonds or notes for the purpose of refunding its bonds or notes outstanding, including the payment of any redemption premium on them and any interest accrued, or to accrue, to the earliest or subsequent date of redemption, purchase, or maturity of the bonds or notes. The proceeds of bonds or notes, issued for the purpose of refunding outstanding bonds or notes may be applied, in the discretion of the authority, to the purchase, retirement at maturity, or redemption of the outstanding bonds or notes either on their earliest or a subsequent redemption date, and may, pending that application, be placed in escrow. These escrowed proceeds may be invested, and reinvested, in obligations of, or guaranteed by, the United States, or in certificates of deposit or time deposits or repurchase agreements, fully secured or guaranteed by the state or the United States, or an instrumentality of either, maturing at any time or times as shall be appropriate to assure the prompt payment, as to principal, interest, and redemption premium, if any, of the outstanding bonds or notes to be refunded. The interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on this investment, may also be applied to the payment of the outstanding bonds or notes to be refunded. After the terms of the escrow have been fully satisfied and carried out, any balance of the proceeds and interest, income, and profits, if any, earned or realized on the investments of these, may be returned to the authority for use by it in furtherance of its purposes. All these bonds or notes shall be issued and secured and shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter in the manner, and to the same extent, as any other bonds or notes issued pursuant to this chapter.

The directors, officers of the authority, and other persons executing the bonds shall not be subject to personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance of these.

Bonds or notes may be issued under the provisions of this chapter without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, body, bureau, or agency of the state, and without any other proceedings, conditions, or things other than those proceedings, conditions, or things that are specifically required by this chapter and by the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of those bonds or notes or the trust agreement securing this.

The authority, subject to any agreements with noteholders or bondholders as may then be in force, shall have power, out of any funds available for this, to purchase bonds or notes of the authority, which shall then be cancelled, at a price not exceeding:

If the bonds or notes are then redeemable, the redemption price then applicable plus accrued interest to the next interest payment date; or

If the bonds or notes are not then redeemable, the redemption price applicable on the earliest date that the bonds or notes become subject to redemption, plus the interest that would have accrued to that date.

Whether or not the bonds and notes are of the form and character as to be negotiable instruments under the terms of the Rhode Island Uniform Commercial Code, title 6A, the bonds and notes are made negotiable instruments within the meaning of, and for all of the purposes of, the Rhode Island Uniform Commercial Code, subject only to the provisions of the bonds and notes for registration.

If a director or officer of the authority whose signature appears on the bonds, notes, or coupons shall cease to be a director or officer before the delivery of those bonds or notes, that signature shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes, as if the director or officer had remained in office until the delivery.

The authority shall also have the power out of any funds available to purchase bonds and notes of the authority if the authority determines that such purchases will stabilize or make the market for the authority’s bonds more efficient. Such purchases shall not result in the extinguishment of the debt of the authority represented by such bonds or notes. At the discretion of the authority, such bonds and notes may be held until the purpose of the purchase has been effected and then sold to the market or used as a credit against future redemptions or maturities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 374, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 375, § 1.

16-62-10.
Security for bonds and notes.

The principal of and interest on any bonds or notes issued by the authority may be secured by a pledge or assignment of any revenues, receipts, or assets of the authority and may be secured by a security interest or other instrument covering all or any part of one or more eligible loans or education loans made or acquired by the authority pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

The resolution under which the bonds or notes are authorized to be issued and any security interest or other instrument may contain any agreements and provisions respecting the servicing of the loans covered by it, any fixing and collection of payments or repayments or other revenues from these, any creation and maintenance of special funds from those revenues, and any rights and remedies available in the event of default, all as the authority shall deem advisable.

Each pledge, assignment, agreement, security interest, or other instrument made for the benefit or security of any of the bonds or notes of the authority shall continue in effect until the principal of and interest on the bonds or notes for the benefit of which the pledge or security agreement was made shall have been fully paid, or until provision shall have been made for that payment in the manner provided in the resolution under which the bonds or notes were authorized.

Any pledge made by the authority shall be valid and binding from the time it is made. The money or property pledged and received after this by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without physical delivery or further act. The lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties having a claim in tort, contract, or against the authority, whether or not the parties have notice of the claim. Neither the resolution nor any instrument by which a pledge is created needs to be recorded.

Any resolution under which bonds or notes of authority are authorized to be issued, and any trust indenture established by it, may contain provisions for vesting in a trustee or trustees any properties, rights, powers, and duties in trust as the authority may determine.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 35, § 1.

16-62-11.
Trust funds.

All money received pursuant to the authority of this chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or notes or as revenues, receipts, or income, shall be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in the proceedings under which the bonds or notes are authorized. Any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, any money shall be deposited as trustee of it shall hold and apply the money for its purposes, subject to the applicable provisions of this chapter, the proceedings authorizing the bonds or notes, and the trust agreement securing those bonds or notes, if any.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1.

16-62-12.
Exemption from taxation.

The exercise of the powers granted by this chapter will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state, the increase of their commerce, welfare, and prosperity, and for the improvement of their living conditions, and will constitute the performance of an essential government function; and the authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon or in respect of any transaction or of any property or money of the authority levied by any municipality or political subdivision of the state.

The authority shall not be required to pay state taxes of any kind, and the authority, its property, and money, and, except for estate, inheritance, and gift taxes, any bonds or notes issued under the provisions of this chapter and the income, including gain from sale or exchange from it shall at all times be free from taxation of every kind by the state and by the municipalities and all political subdivisions of the state. The authority shall not be required to pay any transfer tax of any kind on account of instruments recorded by it or on its behalf.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1.

16-62-13.
Notes and bonds as legal investments.

The notes and bonds of the authority are made securities in which all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and municipal subdivisions, including, but not limited to, the authority, all companies and associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business, all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees, and other fiduciaries, and all other persons who are now or may after this be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state, may properly and legally invest funds, including capital, in their control or belonging to them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 374, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 375, § 1.

16-62-14.
Bondholders’ rights not to be affected by state.

The state does pledge to and agree with the holders of any bonds or notes issued under this chapter that the state will not limit or alter the rights vested in the authority to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders until those bonds or notes, together with their interest, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of those holders, are fully met and discharged. The authority is authorized to include this pledge and agreement of the state in any agreement with the holders of those bonds or notes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1.

16-62-15.
Credit of state.

Obligations issued under the provisions of this chapter shall not constitute a debt, liability, or obligation of the state or of any political subdivision of the state other than the authority or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or any political subdivision other than the authority, but shall be payable solely from the revenues or assets of the authority. Each obligation issued under this chapter shall contain on its face a statement to the effect that the authority shall not be obligated to pay the obligation or its interest except from revenues or assets pledged for it and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or any political subdivision of the state other than the authority is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the obligation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1.

16-62-16.
Authorization to accept appropriated money.

The authority is authorized to accept any money as may be appropriated by the general assembly for effectuating its corporate purposes including, without limitation, the payment of the initial expenses of administration and operation and the establishment of reserves or contingency funds to be available for the payment of the principal of and the interest on any bonds, notes, or other obligations of the authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1.

16-62-17.
Assistance by state officers, departments, boards, and commissions.

All state agencies may render any services to the authority within their functions as may be requested by the authority.

Upon request of the authority, any state agency is authorized and empowered to transfer to the authority any officers and employees as it may deem necessary to assist the authority in carrying out its functions and duties under this chapter. Officers and employees transferred shall not lose their civil service status or rights.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1.

16-62-18.
Annual report.

Within six (6) months after the close of its fiscal year the board shall approve and submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall provide: an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, meeting minutes if requested, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, rules or regulations promulgated, studies conducted, policies and plans developed, approved, or modified, and programs administered or initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and expended including the source of the funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds, and a summary of any clerical, administrative or technical support received; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; a synopsis of hearings, complaints, suspensions, or other legal matters related to the authority; a summary of any training courses held pursuant to this chapter; a briefing on anticipated activities in the upcoming fiscal year; and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be posted electronically on the general assembly and the secretary of state’s websites as prescribed in §

42-20-8.2

. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of this provision. The authority shall cause an audit of its books and accounts to be made at least once each fiscal year by certified public accountants selected by it and the its cost shall be paid by the authority from funds available to it pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 241, § 8; P.L. 2005, ch. 319, § 8.

16-62-19.
Inconsistent provisions.

When any provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law or ordinance, general, special, or local, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1.

16-62-20.
Supplemental nature of powers — Issuance of bonds and notes governed by this chapter.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall restrict or limit the powers of the authority arising under any laws of this state. This chapter shall be construed to provide a complete additional and alternative method for doing the things authorized by it and shall be regarded as supplemental and in addition to the powers conferred by other laws. The issuance of all bonds, notes, and other obligations of the authority under the provisions of this chapter need not comply with the requirements of any other statute applicable to the issuance of bonds, notes, or other obligations. No proceedings or notice of approval shall be required for the issuance of any bonds, notes, and other obligations or any instruments of security for these except as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1.

16-62-21.
Construction.

This chapter being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 44, § 1.